Delaware, session 153, HB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Three-fifths of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Chapter 459, Volume 84 of the Laws of Delaware, as amended by Chapter 1, Volume 85 of the Laws of Delaware, by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Section 2. This Act takes effect on June 2, 2025. February 2, 2026. Section 2. Amend Chapter 1, Volume 85 of the Laws of Delaware by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Section 5. Section 1 of this Act takes effect upon enactment. Sections 2 through 4 of this Act take effect on June 2, 2025. February 2, 2026. Section 6. The Division of Revenue shall conduct outreach to agencies and customers before February 2, 2026, to provide information about the changes that will be implemented in the trade name registration process. The outreach must include an FAQ guide to the changes posted on the Division of Revenue website.